Florida, session 2026, HB257.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
10
11 Section 1. Paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (5)
12 of section 796.07, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
13 paragraphs (a), (b), and (c), respectively, subsection (4),
14 paragraph (a) and present subsection (d) of subsection (5), and
15 subsection (7) of that section are amended, and subsection (2)
16 of that section is republished, to read:
17 796.07 Prohibiting prostitution and related acts.—
18 (2) It is unlawful:
19 (a) To own, establish, maintain, or operate any place,
20 structure, building, or conveyance for the purpose of lewdness,
21 assignation, or prostitution.
22 (b) To offer, or to offer or agree to secure, another for
23 the purpose of prostitution or for any other lewd or indecent
24 act.
25 (c) To receive, or to offer or agree to receive, any
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
26 person into any place, structure, building, or conveyance for
27 the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation, or to
28 permit any person to remain there for such purpose.
29 (d) To direct, take, or transport, or to offer or agree to
30 direct, take, or transport, any person to any place, structure,
31 or building, or to any other person, with knowledge or
32 reasonable cause to believe that the purpose of such directing,
33 taking, or transporting is prostitution, lewdness, or
34 assignation.
35 (e) For a person 18 years of age or older to offer to
36 commit, or to commit, or to engage in, prostitution, lewdness,
37 or assignation.
38 (f) To solicit, induce, entice, or procure another to
39 commit prostitution, lewdness, or assignation.
40 (g) To reside in, enter, or remain in, any place,
41 structure, or building, or to enter or remain in any conveyance,
42 for the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation.
43 (h) To aid, abet, or participate in any of the acts or
44 things enumerated in this subsection.
45 (i) To purchase the services of any person engaged in
46 prostitution.
47 (4)(a) A person who violates any provision of this
48 section, other than paragraph (2)(f), commits:
49 (a)1. A felony misdemeanor of the third second degree for
50 a first violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
51 775.083.
52 (b)2. A felony misdemeanor of the second first degree for
53 a second violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
54 775.083.
55 (c)3. A felony of the first third degree for a third or
56 subsequent violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
57 775.083, or s. 775.084.
58 (b) A person who is charged with a third or subsequent
59 violation of this section, other than paragraph (2)(f), shall be
60 offered admission to a pretrial intervention program or a
61 substance abuse treatment program as provided in s. 948.08.
62 (5)(a) A person who violates paragraph (2)(f) commits:
63 1. A misdemeanor of the first degree for a first
64 violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
65 2. A felony of the third degree for a second violation,
66 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
67 3. A felony of the second degree for a third or subsequent
68 violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or
69 s. 775.084.
70 (c)(d)1. If a person who violates paragraph (2)(f) uses a
71 vehicle in the course of the violation, the judge, upon the
72 person's conviction, may issue an order for the impoundment or
73 immobilization of the vehicle for a period of up to 60 days. The
74 order of impoundment or immobilization must include the names
75 and telephone numbers of all immobilization agencies meeting all
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
76 of the conditions of s. 316.193(13). Within 7 business days
77 after the date that the court issues the order of impoundment or
78 immobilization, the clerk of the court must send notice by
79 certified mail, return receipt requested, to the registered
80 owner of the vehicle, if the registered owner is a person other
81 than the defendant, and to each person of record claiming a lien
82 against the vehicle.
83 2. The owner of the vehicle may request the court to
84 dismiss the order. The court must dismiss the order, and the
85 owner of the vehicle will incur no costs, if the owner of the
86 vehicle alleges and the court finds to be true any of the
87 following:
88 a. The owner's family has no other private or public means
89 of transportation;
90 b. The vehicle was stolen at the time of the offense;
91 c. The owner purchased the vehicle after the offense was
92 committed, and the sale was not made to circumvent the order and
93 allow the defendant continued access to the vehicle; or
94 d. The vehicle is owned by the defendant but is operated
95 solely by employees of the defendant or employees of a business
96 owned by the defendant.
97 3. If the court denies the request to dismiss the order,
98 the petitioner may request an evidentiary hearing. If, at the
99 evidentiary hearing, the court finds to be true any of the
100 circumstances described in sub-subparagraphs 2.a.-d. (d)2.a.-d.,
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
101 the court must dismiss the order and the owner of the vehicle
102 will incur no costs.
103 (7) If the place, structure, building, or conveyance that
104 is owned, established, maintained, or operated in violation of
105 paragraph (2)(a) is a massage establishment that is or should be
106 licensed under s. 480.043, the offense shall be reclassified to
107 the next higher degree as follows:
108 (a) A felony misdemeanor of the third second degree for a
109 first violation is reclassified as a felony misdemeanor of the
110 second first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
111 775.083.
112 (b) A felony misdemeanor of the second first degree for a
113 second violation is reclassified as a felony of the first third
114 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
115 775.084.
116 (c) A felony of the first third degree for a third or
117 subsequent violation is reclassified as a life felony of the
118 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
119 or s. 775.084.
120 Section 2. Paragraph (l) of subsection (4) and paragraph
121 (q) of subsection (5) of section 456.074, Florida Statutes, are
122 amended to read:
123 456.074 Certain health care practitioners; immediate
124 suspension of license.—
125 (4) The department shall issue an emergency order
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
126 suspending the license of a massage therapist and establishment
127 as those terms are defined in chapter 480 upon receipt of
128 information that the massage therapist; the designated
129 establishment manager as defined in chapter 480; an employee of
130 the establishment; a person with an ownership interest in the
131 establishment; or, for a corporation that has more than $250,000
132 of business assets in this state, the owner, officer, or
133 individual directly involved in the management of the
134 establishment has been arrested for committing or attempting,
135 soliciting, or conspiring to commit, or convicted or found
136 guilty of, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
137 to, regardless of adjudication, a violation of s. 796.07 or a
138 felony offense under any of the following provisions of state
139 law or a similar provision in another jurisdiction:
140 (l) Section 796.07 796.07(4)(a)3., relating to a felony of
141 the third degree for a third or subsequent violation of s.
142 796.07, relating to prohibiting prostitution and related acts.
143 (5) The department shall issue an emergency order
144 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is
145 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring
146 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of
147 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar
148 offenses in another jurisdiction:
149 (q) Section 796.07(4)(c) 796.07(4)(a)3., relating to a
150 felony of the first third degree for a third or subsequent
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
151 violation of s. 796.07, relating to prohibiting prostitution and
152 related acts.
153 Section 3. Paragraph (l) of subsection (6) of section
154 480.041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
155 480.041 Massage therapists; qualifications; licensure;
156 endorsement.—
157 (6) The board shall deny an application for a new or
158 renewal license if an applicant has been convicted or found
159 guilty of, or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to,
160 regardless of adjudication, a violation of s. 796.07(2)(a) which
161 is reclassified under s. 796.07(7) or a felony offense under any
162 of the following provisions of state law or a similar provision
163 in another jurisdiction:
164 (l) Section 796.07(4)(c) 796.07(4)(a)3., relating to a
165 felony of the first third degree for a third or subsequent
166 violation of s. 796.07, relating to prohibiting prostitution and
167 related acts.
168 Section 4. Subsection (8) of section 480.043, Florida
169 Statutes, is amended to read:
170 480.043 Massage establishments; requisites; licensure;
171 inspection; human trafficking awareness training and policies.—
172 (8) The department shall deny an application for a new or
173 renewal license if an establishment owner or a designated
174 establishment manager or, for a corporation that has more than
175 $250,000 of business assets in this state, an establishment
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
176 owner, a designated establishment manager, or any individual
177 directly involved in the management of the establishment has
178 been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
179 to any misdemeanor or felony crime, regardless of adjudication,
180 related to prostitution or related acts as described in s.
181 796.07 or a felony offense under any of the following provisions
182 of state law or a similar provision in another jurisdiction:
183 (a) Section 787.01, relating to kidnapping.
184 (b) Section 787.02, relating to false imprisonment.
185 (c) Section 787.025, relating to luring or enticing a
186 child.
187 (d) Section 787.06, relating to human trafficking.
188 (e) Section 787.07, relating to human smuggling.
189 (f) Section 794.011, relating to sexual battery.
190 (g) Section 794.08, relating to female genital mutilation.
191 (h) Former s. 796.03, relating to procuring a person under
192 the age of 18 for prostitution.
193 (i) Former s. 796.035, relating to selling or buying of
194 minors into prostitution.
195 (j) Section 796.04, relating to forcing, compelling, or
196 coercing another to become a prostitute.
197 (k) Section 796.05, relating to deriving support from the
198 proceeds of prostitution.
199 (l) Section 796.07, relating to prohibiting prostitution
200 and related acts.
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
201 (m)(l) Section 800.04, relating to lewd or lascivious
202 offenses committed upon or in the presence of persons less than
203 16 years of age.
204 (n)(m) Section 825.1025(2)(b), relating to lewd or
205 lascivious offenses committed upon or in the presence of an
206 elderly or disabled person.
207 (o)(n) Section 827.071, relating to sexual performance by
208 a child.
209 (p)(o) Section 847.0133, relating to the protection of
210 minors.
211 (q)(p) Section 847.0135, relating to computer pornography.
212 (r)(q) Section 847.0138, relating to the transmission of
213 material harmful to minors to a minor by electronic device or
214 equipment.
215 (s)(r) Section 847.0145, relating to the selling or buying
216 of minors.
217 Section 5. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
218 480.046, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
219 480.046 Grounds for disciplinary action by the board.—
220 (3) The board shall revoke or suspend the license of a
221 massage establishment licensed under this act, or deny
222 subsequent licensure of such an establishment, if any of the
223 following occurs:
224 (c) The establishment owner, the designated establishment
225 manager, or any individual providing massage therapy services
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 257 2026
226 for the establishment has had the entry in any jurisdiction of:
227 1. A final order or other disciplinary action taken for
228 sexual misconduct involving prostitution;
229 2. A final order or other disciplinary action taken for
230 crimes related to the practice of massage therapy involving
231 prostitution; or
232 3. A conviction or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to
233 any misdemeanor or felony crime, regardless of adjudication,
234 related to prostitution or related acts as described in s.
235 796.07.
236 Section 6. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb257-00